Florida, session 2026, HB217.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 28 of chapter 2025-190, Laws of
Florida, is amended to read:
Section 28. (1) As used in this section, the term
"impacted local government" means a county listed in the Federal
Disaster Declaration for Hurricane Debby (DR-4806), Hurricane
Helene (DR-4828), or Hurricane Milton (DR-4834) which was
designated or within which a tribal area was designated as
eligible for both individual assistance and public assistance
under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency
Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 5121 et seq., and each municipality
within one of those counties.
(2) An impacted local government Each county listed in the
Federal Disaster Declaration for Hurricane Debby (DR-4806),
Hurricane Helene (DR-4828), or Hurricane Milton (DR-4834), and
each municipality within one of those counties, may not propose
or adopt any moratorium on construction, reconstruction, or
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb217-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 217 2026
redevelopment of any property damaged by Hurricane Debby,
Hurricane Helene, or Hurricane Milton such hurricanes; propose
or adopt more restrictive or burdensome amendments to its
comprehensive plan or land development regulations; or propose
or adopt more restrictive or burdensome procedures concerning
review, approval, or issuance of a site plan, development
permit, or development order, to the extent that those terms are
defined by s. 163.3164, Florida Statutes, before October 1,
2027, and any such moratorium or restrictive or burdensome
comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or
procedure shall be null and void ab initio. This subsection
applies retroactively to August 1, 2024.
(3)(2) Notwithstanding subsection (2) (1), any
comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation
amendment, site plan, development permit, or development order
approved or adopted by an impacted local government a county or
municipality before or after the effective date of this act may
be enforced if:
(a) The associated application is initiated by a private
party other than the impacted local government county or
municipality.
(b) The property that is the subject of the application is
owned by the initiating private party.
(4)(a)(3)(a) A resident of or the owner of a business in
an impacted local government a county or municipality may bring
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb217-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 217 2026
a civil action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the
impacted local government county or municipality for a violation
of this section. Pending adjudication of the action and upon
filing of a complaint showing a violation of this section, the
resident or business owner is entitled to a preliminary
injunction against the impacted local government county or
municipality preventing implementation of the moratorium or the
comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or
procedure. If such civil action is successful, the resident or
business owner is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and
costs.
(b) Attorney fees and costs and damages may not be awarded
pursuant to this subsection if:
1. The resident or business owner provides the governing
body of the impacted local government county or municipality
written notice that a proposed or enacted moratorium,
comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or
procedure is in violation of this section; and
2. The governing body of the impacted local government
county or municipality withdraws the proposed moratorium,
comprehensive plan amendment, land development regulation, or
procedure within 14 days; or, in the case of an adopted
moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, land development
regulation, or procedure, the governing body of an impacted
local government a county or municipality notices an intent to
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb217-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 217 2026
repeal within 14 days after receipt of the notice and repeals
the moratorium, comprehensive plan amendment, land development
regulation, or procedure within 14 days thereafter.
(5)(4) This section expires June 30, 2028.
Section 2. The amendments made by this act to s. 28 of
chapter 2025-190, Laws of Florida, apply retroactively to August
1, 2024.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb217-00